Connecticut, session 2026, HB05181.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
three million seven hundred thirty thousand dollars, the proceeds of
which shall be used by the Department of Economic and Community
Development for the purpose of providing (1) a grant-in-aid in the
amount of one hundred thousand dollars to the First Haitian Baptist
Church of Norwich in the city of Norwich for capital improvements; (2)
a grant-in-aid in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars to the
Chestnut Street Playhouse in the city of Norwich for capital
improvements; (3) a grant-in-aid in the amount of seven hundred
twenty thousand dollars to the Norwich Arts Center in the city of
LCO No. 862 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5181
Norwich for capital improvements; (4) a grant-in-aid in the amount of
nine hundred thirty thousand dollars to the Saint Mary's Church in the
city of Norwich for capital improvements; (5) a grant-in-aid in the
amount of five hundred thousand dollars to the Greeneville
Congregational Church in the city of Norwich for capital improvements;
(6) a grant-in-aid in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars to the
Grace Episcopal Church in the city of Norwich for capital
improvements; (7) a grant-in-aid in the amount of two hundred
thousand dollars to the Evans AME Zion Church in the city of Norwich
for capital improvements; (8) a grant-in-aid in the amount of three
hundred eighty thousand dollars to the Catholic Charities in the city of
Norwich for capital improvements; and (9) a grant-in-aid in the amount
of two hundred thousand dollars to the Divine Providence Church in
the city of Norwich for capital improvements.